Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3737
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Dry Bean Resources Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 2-3738 to 2-3744 shall be used.

Laws 1987, LB 145, § 3.